District of Columbia statutes.
7-1306.04

Authority of Board of Education unchanged.

Nothing herein shall be construed to extend or diminish the authority or responsibility of the D.C. Board of Education vested pursuant to Title 38 of the District of Columbia Official Code and applicable federal laws and regulations.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 605, 25 DCR 5094
1981 Ed., § 6-1984.
1973 Ed., § 6-1698.